Hawaii statutes.
[§291C-74] Drivers to exercise due care.
Notwithstanding other provisions of this chapter, every driver of a vehicle
shall exercise due care to avoid colliding with any pedestrian upon any roadway
and shall give warning by sounding the driver's horn when necessary and shall
exercise proper precaution upon observing any child or any obviously confused
or incapacitated person upon a roadway. [L 1971, c 150, pt of §1; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next